Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-940
Occupational regulation, defined.

(1) Occupational regulation means a statute, rule, regulation, practice, policy, or other state law requiring an individual to possess certain personal qualifications or to comply with registration requirements to use an occupational title or work in a lawful occupation.

(2) Occupational regulation includes any government certification, registration, and occupational license except as otherwise specifically provided in the Occupational Board Reform Act.

(3) Occupational regulation does not include (a) business licensure, facility licensure, building permit requirements, or zoning and land-use regulation except to the extent that the same state laws that require a business license, a facility license, a building permit, or zoning and land-use regulation also regulate an individual's personal qualifications to perform a lawful occupation, (b) an occupational license administered by the Supreme Court, or (c) an occupational credential regulated by the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice.

Laws 2018, LB299, § 8;

Laws 2024, LB16, § 12.
July 19, 2024